New Jersey, session 221, A4669.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. The Commissioner of Education shall develop and administer a three-year United Network for Inclusive Teaching and Youth Grant Program.  The program shall award grants to school district employees facing adverse situations, as defined by the commissioner, to provide access to free or low cost preschool or higher education for dependents of the employee. b. A school district employee who wishes to receive a grant shall submit an application to the commissioner in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner.  The application shall include information required by the commissioner. c. The commissioner shall determine the amount of each grant awarded under the program and may award multi-year grants. 2.    The Commissioner of Education shall submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), no later than six months after the conclusion of the United Network for Inclusive Teaching and Youth Grant Program established pursuant to section 1 of this act. The report shall include, but not be limited to, information on the implementation of the grant program, the number of school district employees supported by the grant program, and any recommendations concerning the continuation or expansion of the grant program. 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Education such sums as shall be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4. This act shall take effect immediately.